Louisiana, session 2026, SB171.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:5.1(A), 20(A) and (B), 84(A) and (B), 2351(A) and (B), 2352,
2353(B), 2354(A)(1), (B)(1) and (4), (D)(1), and (E)(1), 2355(A)(1) through (4), (B)(6) and
(10), and (C), the introductory paragraph of 2356(A), 2356(A)(2), and (B)(2) and (5), and
(C), 2358, 2359(B), (D)(2), and (E)(1)(a), and 2360(C) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§5.1. Planning assistance to municipal and other planning agencies; federal grants
A. For the purpose of providing planning assistance to municipal, parish,
regional and other planning agencies of the state of Louisiana in the solution of their
planning problems, the Department of Public Works, State of Louisiana, be and
Transportation and Development, is authorized to apply for and accept grants of
money from the government of the United States or any federal agencies in
connection with such assistance and, to this end, the said department may contract
with the United States or such federal agencies for the acceptance of such grants
including any requirement for matching said grants in whole or in part.
* * *
§20. Red River Compact Commission membership
Page 1 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 171 ENROLLED
A. There shall be two members appointed to represent the state of Louisiana
on the Red River Compact Commission as required by Act No. 71 of the 1978
Regular Session of the Legislature. One member shall be the chief engineer of the
office of engineering of the Department of Transportation and Development
secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development, or his designee
and one member shall be appointed by the governor, subject to Senate confirmation.
B. The member of the Red River Compact Commission appointed by the
governor to represent the state as provided by Article IX of the Red River Compact
contained in Act No. 71 of the 1978 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be
entitled to receive a per diem allowance of fifty dollars for each day of a meeting of
the administration or any of its committees actually attended by such member, to be
paid out of funds available for the purpose by the office of engineering of the
Department of Transportation and Development secretary of the Department of
Transportation and Development, on his own warrant. In addition, such the
appointed member of the administration shall be entitled to be reimbursed for
expenses actually incurred in attending meetings of the administration or its
committees, or in the transaction of any business of the administration, to be paid out
of funds available for that purpose by the office of engineering of the Department of
Transportation and Development.
* * *
§84. Parishes and municipalities authorized to comply with federal flood insurance
act
A. In order to secure for the citizens of the state of Louisiana the flood
insurance coverage provided for by the National Flood Insurance Act of 1968, 42
U.S.C. 4001 et seq., all of the parishes and municipalities of the state may adopt, in
coordination with the chief resilience officer such Department of Transportation
and Development ordinances, rules, and regulations, including zoning and land use
regulations, as are necessary to comply with the requirements of said the Act and the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto by the Federal Emergency Management
Agency. For upland noncoastal areas of the state as defined in R.S. 38:2352, said
Page 2 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 171 ENROLLED
ordinances, rules, and regulations shall also comply with any statewide floodplain
management standards which may be established by the Coordinated Use of
Resources for Recreation, Economy, Navigation, and Transportation Authority.
B. The chief resilience officer Department of Transportation and
Development shall cooperate with the Federal Insurance Administrator of the
Federal Emergency Management Agency in the planning and carrying out of state
participation in the National Flood Insurance Program and shall aid, advise, and
cooperate with parishes and municipalities endeavoring to qualify for participation
in said program.
* * *
§2351. Coordinated Use of Resources for Recreation, Economy, Navigation, and
Transportation Authority; purpose and intent
A. The Coordinated Use of Resources for Recreation, Economy, Navigation,
and Transportation Authority, referred to in this Chapter as the "authority", is hereby
established as the single coordinating entity responsible for the prioritization,
planning, and funding of projects related to flood control, flood risk reduction,
navigation, and water resource floodplain and watershed management in all areas
of the state not included within the coastal area as defined in R.S. 49:214.2.
B. The legislature declares that it is the public policy of the state to develop
and implement, on a comprehensive and coordinated basis, an integrated plan that
shall support and integrate the development and implementation of policies and
initiatives for flood protection, infrastructure planning, and economic development
in the upland noncoastal area. Consistent with this goal, it is the policy of this state
to achieve a proper balance between development and conservation and encourage
the use of state resources in responsible economic development of the area. The
authority shall implement the policy within these areas ensuring the efficient and
coordinated management of water resources within its jurisdiction, addressing issues
related to water quantity watershed management, flood risk mitigation, floodplain
management, navigation, economic development, and recreation. It shall be the
policy of the state within these areas that through the comprehensive and coordinated
Page 3 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 171 ENROLLED
efforts and acting in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter, the authority
shall exercise all powers necessary to plan, develop, and implement projects and
programs consistent with the legislative intent expressed in this Chapter.
* * *
§2352. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed
to them:
(1) "Integrated" means the coordinated planning, funding, construction, and
operation of flood control, floodplain management, navigation, recreation, water
watershed management, and economic development projects to ensure efficient use
of resources, minimize conflicts, and promote sustainable development.
(2) "Upland Noncoastal area" means all land in the state of Louisiana that
is not included within the coastal area as defined in R.S. 49:214.2.
(3) "Upland Noncoastal parishes" means all parishes of the state, in whole
or in part, that are not included within the coastal area as defined in R.S. 49:214.2.
These areas are primarily affected by riverine flooding, watershed management,
inland navigation, and flood control infrastructure rather than coastal erosion or sea
level rise.
§2353. Coordinated Use of Resources for Recreation, Economy, Navigation, and
Transportation Authority Board
* * *
B.(1) The Coordinated Use of Resources for Recreation, Economy,
Navigation, and Transportation Authority Board shall consist of no more than sixteen
members, selected by the governor, representing the following:
(a) The Red River Waterway District, nominated by the commission.
(b) The office of multimodal commerce. The commissioner shall serve until,
or without, express gubernatorial designation of an alternative.
(c) Statewide flood protection. The chief resiliency officer shall serve until,
or without, express gubernatorial designation of an alternative.
(d) Louisiana Economic Development. The secretary of the department shall
Page 4 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 171 ENROLLED
serve until, or without, express gubernatorial designation of an alternative.
(e) The North Louisiana Economic Partnership. The executive director shall
serve until, or without, express gubernatorial designation of an alternative.
(f) The Department of Culture, Recreation and Tourism. The lieutenant
governor shall serve until, or without, express gubernatorial designation of an
alternative.
(g) Ports, located within the upland parishes, whole or in part.
(h) A levee board located within the upland parishes, whole or in part.
(i) Duly elected members of the executive branch of local government
located within the upland parishes, whole or in part.
(j) The Department of Agriculture and Forestry. The commissioner shall
serve until, or without, express gubernatorial designation of an alternative.
(k) Industry operating and located within the upland parishes, whole or in
part. The executive directors of the Red River Valley Association and Ouachita
River Valley Association, shall serve until, or without, express gubernatorial
designation of an alternative.
(l) The Tensas Basin Levee District, nominated by the Tensas Basin Levee
District.
(2) The board shall not consist of more than two port directors and no more
than two levee boards.
B.(1) The Coordinated Use of Resources for Recreation, Economy,
Navigation, and Transportation Authority Board also known as
"C.U.R.R.E.N.T." shall consist of sixteen members as follows:
(a) The lieutenant governor, or his designee, shall serve as representative
of the Department of Culture, Recreation and Tourism.
(b) The commissioner of the Department of Agriculture and Forestry, or
his designee.
(c) A member appointed by the governor who shall serve as chairman of
the board.
(d) The executive director of the Coastal Protection and Restoration
Page 5 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 171 ENROLLED
Authority Board pursuant to R.S. 49:214.5.1, or the gubernatorial designee for
this appointee shall be a nonvoting member.
(e) The commissioner of the office of multimodal commerce, Department
of Transportation and Development.
(f) Statewide flood protection chief resiliency officer.
(g) A duly elected member of the executive branch of local government
located within the noncoastal parishes, whole or in part.
(h) Two members from levee districts located within the noncoastal
parishes, whole or in part.
(i) A member nominated from Tensas Basin Levee District.
(j) A member of the Red River Waterway District, nominated by the
commission.
(k) The executive director of the Red River Valley Association.
(l) The executive director of Ouachita River Valley Association.
(m)The executive director of the North Louisiana Economic Partnership.
(n) Two members from ports located within the noncoastal parishes,
whole or in part.
(2) The members appointed pursuant to Paragraph (1)(c) through (n) of
this Subsection shall be appointed by the governor and serve as members of the
board unless express gubernatorial designation of an alternative and shall be
subject to Senate confirmation.
(3) The board shall consist of no more than two representatives from
ports and no more than three representatives from levee districts.
* * *
§2354. Master and annual plans; development; priorities
A.(1) The board shall, in accordance with the procedures set forth in this
Section, develop a master plan and an annual plan for protecting, conserving,
enhancing, and developing the area outside the coastal zone area through the
construction and management of integrated projects and programs, including
privately funded projects or plans, and addressing those activities that significantly
Page 6 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 171 ENROLLED
affect such projects, all consistent with the legislative intent as expressed in this
Chapter, and which plan shall be subject to the approval of the legislature as
provided in Subsections B and E of this Section. In addition, the board, in
accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section including legislative
approval, shall review, revise, and amend the master plan when necessary or, at a
minimum, every six years.
* * *
B. The board shall develop the master and annual plans in accordance with
the following procedure:
(1) The board shall conduct not less than three public hearings in separate
locations in the upland noncoastal parishes for the purpose of receiving comments
and recommendations from the public and elected officials. All public hearings must
be held at least sixty days prior to the submission of the plans to the legislature.
* * *
(4) At least seven days prior to each hearing the board shall publish a notice
of the hearing in the official journal of each parish within the area of the hearing. The
notice of a hearing shall have been published in the official journal of each parish in
the upland noncoastal area prior to the final scheduled public hearing. The board
may provide for additional public hearings when necessary upon at least three days
notice published in the official journal of the parishes in the area of the hearing and
written notice to the parish governing authorities.
* * *
D.(1) Where feasible, the master plan shall include scientific data and other
reasons, including but not limited to the social, geographic, economic, engineering,
and biological considerations as to why each project or program was selected for
inclusion. Specifically, an explanation shall be included as to how each project or
program advances the plan objectives with respect to the protection, conservation,
enhancement, and development of the upland noncoastal area.
* * *
E.(1) After adoption by the board, the master plan shall be submitted to the
Page 7 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 171 ENROLLED
House Committee on Natural Resources and Environment and the Senate Committee
on Natural Resources and the House Committee on Transportation, Highways and
Public Works and the Senate Committee on Transportation, Highways and Public
Works for approval. In addition, the annual plan shall be submitted to the House
Committee on Natural Resources and Environment and the Senate Committee on
Natural Resources and the House Committee on Transportation, Highways and
Public Works and the Senate Committee on Transportation, Highways and Public
Works on or before the fifteenth day of the regular legislative session of each year.
The committees shall take action on the annual plan on or before June first of each
calendar year.
* * *
§2355. Functions and responsibilities; Coordinated Use of Resources for Recreation,
Economy, Navigation, and Transportation Authority Board
A. The board shall:
(1) Represent the state's position on policy relative to the protection,
conservation, enhancement, and management of the upland noncoastal area of the
state through oversight of integrated projects and programs and by addressing
activities which could significantly affect integrated projects and programs, all
consistent with the legislative intent as expressed in this Title.
(2) Develop, coordinate, make reports on, and provide oversight for a
comprehensive upland noncoastal area master plan and annual plans, working in
conjunction with state agencies, political subdivisions, including flood protection
authorities, levee districts, and federal agencies. The master plan shall include a
comprehensive strategy addressing the protection, conservation, enhancement, and
management of the upland area through the construction and management of
integrated projects and programs, all consistent with the legislative intent as
expressed in this Chapter. The annual plan shall be developed as the annual
implementation of the comprehensive master plan and shall be submitted to the
legislature for approval as set forth in R.S. 38:2354. The annual plan shall include
a description and status of all projects and programs pertaining to the authority's
Page 8 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 171 ENROLLED
mission, including privately funded projects or plans, and addressing those activities
which significantly affect projects set forth in the plan, all consistent with the
legislative intent as expressed in this Title.
(3) Submit to the House Committee on Natural Resources and Environment
and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and the House Committee on
Transportation, Highways and Public Works and the Senate Committee on
Transportation, Highways and Public Works the integrated plans developed pursuant
to R.S. 38:2354. Upon approval of the plans by the legislative committees and prior
to implementation of the plans, in whole or in part, the plans shall be approved by
the legislature as provided in R.S. 38:2354(E).
(4) Develop procedures in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act
and take actions against any entity, including political subdivisions, to enforce
compliance with the comprehensive master upland noncoastal area plan. Such
procedures and actions may include but are not limited to determinations of
noncompliance; appeal from such determinations; the taking of administrative
action, including the withholding of funds; and civil action, including the seeking of
injunctive relief, or any other remedy necessary to ensure compliance with the plan.
* * *
B. The board may:
* * *
(6) Approve all requests for programs and projects in the upland noncoastal
area, insofar as such requests are for funds to be appropriated from the funds
available to the authority.
* * *
(10) Enter into any agreement with a parish governing authority located
wholly or partially within the coastal area but which is not part of a levee district for
the construction, operation, maintenance, repair, rehabilitation, or replacement of any
upland noncoastal protection, conservation and restoration, hurricane protection,
infrastructure, storm damage reduction, integrated coastal protection, or flood control
project. The board shall have the power to provide in the agreement for the use and
Page 9 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 171 ENROLLED
exercise by the parish governing authority of all powers of levee districts or levee
and drainage districts.
C. Approval by the board shall be required for any request by a state agency
or department for any funds to finance research, programs, mitigation, or projects
involving integrated protection, including hurricane protection or the conservation
and restoration, of upland noncoastal areas. However, this Subsection shall not
affect self-generated or dedicated funds.
* * *
§2356. Coordinated Use of Resources for Recreation, Economy, Navigation, and
Transportation Authority
A. The Coordinated Use of Resources for Recreation, Economy, Navigation,
and Transportation Authority is hereby created within the office of public works
Department of Transportation and Development. The authority shall:
* * *
(2) Serve as the implementation arm of the Statewide Flood Control Program
in R.S. 38:90.1 et seq., and for other functions of the department outside of the
coastal area. The authority shall be Be directed by the policy set by the Coordinated
Use of Resources for Recreation, Economy, Navigation, and Transportation
Authority Board.
* * *
B. * * *
* * *
(2) The governor may appoint an executive director of the Coordinated Use
of Resources for Recreation, Economy, Navigation, and Transportation Authority.
In the event an executive director is not appointed, the director of public works
secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development, or his
designee, may serve as the executive director of the Coordinated Use of Resources
for Recreation, Economy, Navigation, and Transportation Authority.
* * *
(5) The executive director, or in his discretion a subordinate or subordinates,
Page 10 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 171 ENROLLED
shall administer the programs, projects, and activities approved for funding by the
Coordinated Use of Resources for Recreation, Economy, Navigation, and
Transportation Authority Board relating to and affecting an integrated upland
noncoastal system, including conservation, restoration, creation, and enhancement
of upland noncoastal areas, storm damage reduction, flood control, infrastructure,
economic development, and navigation in Louisiana's uplands area noncoastal areas
as provided by law and as provided in the master and annual plans, and other special
programs as may be directed by the board.
* * *
C. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to diminish or impair the
constitutional, statutory, or contractual authority of any levee district, drainage
district, navigation district, or port commission operating within the upland
noncoastal area. The authority shall coordinate with such entities to the greatest
extent practicable.
* * *
§2358. Interaction with Coastal Protection and Restoration Authority
The Coastal Protection and Restoration Authority and the Coordinated Use
of Resources for Recreation, Economy, Navigation, and Transportation Authority
shall jointly develop integrated flood protection strategies. The Coastal Protection
and Restoration Authority shall remain responsible for its functions and
responsibilities as defined in R.S. 49:214.5.1 et seq. The Coordinated Use of
Resources for Recreation, Economy, Navigation, and Transportation Authority shall
oversee riverine flood management, inland navigation, and water resource flood
control infrastructure within the upland noncoastal area as defined in R.S. 38:2352
and as consistent with this Chapter.
§2359. Functions and responsibilities; Coordinated Use of Resources for Recreation,
Economy, Navigation, and Transportation Authority
* * *
B. The authority shall implement projects in the upland noncoastal area as
approved by the board and consistent with the legislative intent of this Chapter.
Page 11 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 171 ENROLLED
However, no project shall be undertaken except those included in an annual plan
finally approved by the legislature in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
38:2354, regardless of the source of funds for the project, except in cases of projects
undertaken and financed out of the emergency fund, established in the annual plan.
An emergency for which such fund shall be used shall be defined by the Coordinated
Use of Resources for Recreation, Economy, Navigation, and Transportation
Authority Board and all funds shall be spent only in accord with procedures
established by the authority board for such fund. All projects undertaken pursuant
to the provisions of this Chapter shall be either funded through the Statewide Flood
Program, the state general fund, or other sources of funding available to the
authority, including but not limited to direct federal aid, grants, gifts, and other
donations received by the state for the purposes of this Chapter.
* * *
D. The authority may:
* * *
(2) Acquire by purchase, donation, or otherwise any land rights needed for
integrated upland noncoastal area projects and other property required for the
operation of the projects that are to be owned and operated by the office or political
subdivision of the state; provided, that any property acquired for any project may
reserve the minerals to the landowners, whether private or public, in accordance with
the provisions of R.S. 31:149.
* * *
E.(1) The board or the authority shall be authorized to solely utilize the
science and technology capacity of Louisiana universities, the water institute, and
other institutes within the state to enhance programs, projects, and activities for the
following purposes:
(a) To identify any uncertainty related to the physical, chemical, geological,
biological, or cultural baseline conditions in the upland noncoastal area.
* * *
§2360. Infrastructure priority program; applications; evaluations
Page 12 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 171 ENROLLED
* * *
C. The applications submitted by agencies shall be evaluated by the board
which shall hold no less than three public hearings in separate locations within the
upland noncoastal area for the purpose of receiving public testimony and comment
from requesting authorities and citizens regarding the proposed infrastructure
projects. Such hearings may be held at the same time and location as hearings set for
public comment on the annual plan. The authority shall prioritize and rank such
applications. The authority shall provide its application evaluations to the board.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 38:2353(D) is hereby repealed.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 13 of 13
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.